Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
136]

LASER
POINTING DEVICES

Section

136-1 Definitions

136-2 Harassment; prohibited

136-3 Sale to minors; prohibited

136-4 Possession of laser pointing devices by
minors

prohibited

136-5 Exemptions

136-6 Penalties

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next